Utah statutes.
71-11-7.   Veterans' Nursing Home Advisory Boards.
(1) (a)  Each home shall have a Veterans' Nursing Home Advisory Board to act
as a liaison between the residents, members of the public, and the
administration of the home.
(b)  The board shall interview candidates for the position of nursing home
administrator and make a recommendation to the department.
(2)  Each board shall consist of the following seven members:
(a)  one resident of the home appointed by the governor;
(b)  two members of the Veterans' Advisory Council, designated by the
governor, one of which shall specifically be designated as the board's
representative to the council;
(c)  one veteran from the area in which the home is located appointed by the
governor;
(d)  one representative from the VA Health Care System, appointed by its
director;
(e)  one representative from the Department of Health, appointed by its
executive director; and
(f)  one representative from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
regional office.
(3) (a) (i)  Members shall serve for four-year terms.
(ii)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board
members expire, the governor shall appoint each new or reappointed member to a
four-year term beginning on July 1.
(b)  The governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust
the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so
that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  The governor shall make final appointments to the board by June 30 of any
year in which appointments are to be made under this chapter.
(4)  Vacancies shall be filled by the governor within 60 days of receiving
notice of a vacancy, but only for the unexpired term of the vacated member.
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), members may not serve more
than two consecutive terms.
(b)  Members appointed by the VA Health Care System and the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs are exempt from the term limit requirement.
(6)  Each board shall elect a chair annually from among its members at its
first meeting after July 1.
(7)  Each board shall meet at least quarterly.
(8)  Four members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(9)  Each board shall provide copies of all minutes and an annual report of
its activities by June 30 of each year to the executive director of the
Department of Veterans' Affairs, and the Veterans' Advisory Council.
(10) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive salary,
per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive per diem
and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties from the
board at the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections
63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
